tools/nvda/louis/tables/my-g2.ctb
# YaGout				
always ရ	13456-126
always ရာ	13456-1
always ရာ့	13456-126
always ရား	13456-1-23
always ရိ	13456-24
always ရီ	13456-246
always ရီး	13456-246-23
always ရု	13456-136-2
always ရူ	13456-136
always ရူ့	13456-136-2
always ရူး	13456-136-23
always ရေ	13456-156
always ရေ့	13456-156-2
always ရေး	13456-156-23
always ရဲ	13456-2346-23
always ရဲ့	13456-2346-2
always ရံ	13456-124
always ရံ့	13456-124-2
always ရို	13456-135
always ရို့	13456-135-2
always ရိုး	13456-135-23
always ရက်	13456-15
always ရိက်	13456-156-13
always ရိုက်	13456-346
always ရောက်	13456-356
always ရုက်	13456-236
always ရင်	13456-35
always ရင့်	13456-35-2
always ရင်း	13456-35-23
always ရောင်	13456-2356
always ရောင့်	13456-2356-2
always ရောင်း	13456-2356-23
always ရိုင်	13456-235
always ရိုင့်	13456-235-2
always ရိုင်း	13456-235-23
always ရှိုင်	146-235
always ရှိုင့်	146-235-2
always  ရှိုင်း	146-235-23
always ရစ်	13456-1346
always ရဉ်	13456-35
always ရဉ့်	13456-35-2
always ရဉ်း	13456-35-23
always ရည်	13456-246
always ရည့်	13456-24
always ရည်း	13456-246-23
always ရတ်	13456-126-2345
always ရိတ်	13456-156-13
always ရုတ်	13456-236
always ရန်	13456-124
always ရန့်	13456-124-2
always ရန်း	13456-124-23
always ရွန်	13456-136-1345
always ရွန့်	13456-136-1345-2
always ရွန်း	13456-136-1345-23
always ရုန်	13456-14
always ရုန့်	13456-14-2
always ရုန်း	13456-14-23
always ရပ်	13456-126-2345
always ရိပ်	13456-156-13
always ရုပ်	13456-236
always ရမ်	13456-124
always ရမ့်	13456-124-2
always ရမ်း	13456-124-23
always ရုံ	13456-14
always ရုံ့	13456-14-2
always ရုံး	13456-14-23
always ရယ်	13456-2346
always ရယ့်	13456-2346-2
always ရသ်	13456-126-2345
always ရွ	13456-2456-126
always ရွာ	13456-2456-1
always ရွာ့	13456-2456-126
always ရွား	13456-2456-1-23
always ရွေ	13456-2456-156
always ရွေ့	13456-2456-156-2
always ရွေး	13456-2456-156-23
always ရွဲ	13456-2456-2346-23
always ရွဲ့	13456-2456-2346-2
always ရွံ	13456-136-1345
always ရွံ့	13456-136-1345-2
always ရွက်	13456-2456-15
always ရွတ်	13456-136-2345
always ရွပ်	13456-136-2345
always ရွမ်	13456-2456-124
always ရွမ့်	13456-2456-124-2
always ရွမ်း	13456-2456-124-23
always ရွယ်	13456-2456-2346
always ရွယ့်	13456-2456-2346-2
always ရှ	146-126
always ရှာ	146-1
always ရှား	146-1-23
always ရှိ	146
always ရှု	146-136-2
always ရှူ	146-136
always ရှူး	146-136-23
always ရှေ	146-156
always ရှေ့	146-156-2
always ရှေး	146-156-23
always ရှဲ	146-2346-23
always ရှဲ့	146-2346-2
always ရှံ	146-124
always ရှံ့	146-124-2
always ရှို	146-135
always ရှို့	146-135-2
always ရှိုး	146-135-23
always ရှက်	146-15
always ရှောက်	146-356
always ရှိုက်	146-346
always ရှင်	146-35
always ရှင့်	146-35-2
always ရှင်း	146-35-23
always ရှောင်	146-2356
always ရှောင့်	146-2356-2
always ရှောင်း	146-2356-23
always ရှစ်	146-1346
always ရှဉ့်	146-35-2
always ရှဉ်	146-35
always ရှဉ့်	146-35-2
always ရှဉ်း	146-35-23
always ရှည်	146-156
always ရှည့်	146-156-2
always ရှည်း	146-156-23
always ရှုတ်	146-236
always ရှိန်	146-26
always ရှိန့်	146-26-2
always ရှိန်း	146-26-23
always ရှုန်	146-14
always ရှုန့်	146-14-2
always ရှုန်း	146-14-23
always ရှပ်	146-126-2345
always ရှုပ်	146-236
always ရှမ်	146-124
always ရှမ့်	146-124-2
always ရှမ်း	146-124-23
always ရှိမ်	146-26
always ရှိမ့်	146-26-2
always ရှိမ်း	146-26-23
always ရှုံ	146-14
always ရှုံ့	146-14-2
always ရှုံး	146-14-23
always ရွှေ	146-2456-156
always ရွှေ့	146-2456-156-2
always ရွှေး	146-2456-156-23
always ရွှံ	146-136-1345
always ရွှံ့	146-136-1345-2
always ရွှင်	146-2456-35
always ရွှင့်	146-2456-35-2
always ရွှင်း	146-2456-35-23
always ရွှန်	146-136-1345
always ရွှန့်	146-136-1345-2
always ရွှန်း	146-136-1345-23
always ရွှပ်	146-136-2345
always ရွှမ်	146-2456-124
always ရွှမ့်	146-2456-124-2
always ရွှမ်း	146-2456-124-23
always ရှော	146-12456-23
always ရှော့	146-12456-2
always ရှော်	146-12456
always ရော	13456-12456-23
always ရော့	13456-12456-2
always ရော်	13456-12456
always ရုဏ်	13456-14
always ရာဏ်	13456-124
always ရှယ်	146-2346
always ရေးလ်	1235-156-23-123-3
always ရ်	1235-3
always ရိုဏ်း	1235-235-23
always ရာယ်	13456-2346
always ရီ့	13456-24
always ရွိုင်	13456-2456-235
always ရွိုင့်	13456-2456-235-2
always ရွိုင်း	13456-2456-235-23
always ရှီ	146-246
always ရှီ့	146-24
always ရှီး	146-246-23
always ရှိတ်	146-156-13
always ရှန်	146-124
always ရှန့်	146-124-2
always ရှန်း	146-124-23
always ရှယ့်	146-2346-2
always ရွှဲ	146-2346-23
always ရွှဲ့	146-2456-2346-2
always ရွှတ်	146-136-2345
always ရဉ်း	13456-35-23
always ရုဗ်	1235-236
always ရိမ်	13456-26

# YaPaLat				
always ယ	13456-126
always ယာ	13456-1
always ယာ့	13456-126
always ယား	13456-1-23
always ယိ	13456-24
always ယီ	13456-246
always ယီး	13456-246-23
always ယု	13456-136-2
always ယူ	13456-136
always ယူ့	13456-136-2
always ယူး	13456-136-23
always ယေ	13456-156
always ယေ့	13456-156-2
always ယေး	13456-156-23
always ယဲ	13456-2346-23
always ယဲ့	13456-2346-2
always ယံ	13456-124
always ယံ့	13456-124-2
always ယို	13456-135
always ယို့	13456-135-2
always ယိုး	13456-135-23
always ယက်	13456-15
always ယောက်	13456-356
always ယုဂ်	13456-236
always ယင်	13456-35
always ယင့်	13456-35-2
always ယင်း	13456-35-23
always ယောင်	13456-2356
always ယောင့်	13456-2356-2
always ယောင်း	13456-2356-23
always ယိုင်	13456-235
always ယိုင့်	13456-235-2
always ယိုင်း	13456-235-23
always ယစ်	13456-1346
always ယဇ်	13456-1346
always ယဉ်	13456-35
always ယဉ့်	13456-35-2
always ယဉ်း	13456-35-23
always ယာဉ်	13456-35
always ယတ်	13456-126-2345
always ယုတ်	13456-236
always ယန်	13456-124
always ယန့်	13456-124-2
always ယန်း	13456-124-23
always ယုန်	13456-14
always ယုန့်	13456-14-2
always ယုန်း	13456-14-23
always ယပ်	13456-126-2345
always ယမ်	13456-124
always ယမ့်	13456-124-2
always ယမ်း	13456-124-23
always ယိမ်	13456-26
always ယိမ့်	13456-26-2
always ယိမ်း	13456-26-23
always ယွမ်	13456-2456-124
always ယွမ့်	13456-2456-124-2
always ယွမ်း	13456-2456-124-23
always ယုံ	13456-14
always ယုံ့	13456-14-2
always ယုံး	13456-14-23
always ယွံ	13456-136-1345
always ယွံ့	13456-136-1345-2
always ယွက်	13456-2456-15
always ယွင်	13456-2456-35
always ယွင့်	13456-2456-35-2
always ယွင်း	13456-2456-35-23
always ယွတ်	13456-136-2345
always ယွန်	13456-136-1345
always ယွန့်	13456-136-1345-2
always ယွန်း	13456-136-1345-23
always ယှက်	146-15
always ယှဉ်	146-35
always ယှဉ့်	146-35-2
always ယှဉ်း	146-35-23
always ယော	13456-12456-23
always ယော့	13456-12456-2
always ယော်	13456-12456
always ယာန်	13456-124
always ယိ	13456-24
always ယီ	13456-246
always ယီ့	13456-24
always ယီး	13456-246-23
always ယွ	13456-2456-126
always ယွာ	13456-2456-1
always ယွာ့	13456-2456-126
always ယွား	13456-2456-1-23
always ယာဉ့်	13456-35-2
always ယာဒ်	13456-126-2345
always ယာမ်	13456-124
always ယွဲ	13456-2456-2346-23
always ယွဲ့	13456-2456-2346-2
always ယှိ	146-24
always ယှီ	146-246
always ယှီး	146-246-23
always ယှေ	146-156
always ယှေ့	146-156-2
always ယှေး	146-156-23
always ယွစ်	13456-2456-1346
always ယွပ်	13456-2456-136-2345
always ယွယ်	13456-2456-2346
always ယွယ့်	13456-2456-2346-2
always ယှစ်	146-1346
always ယှတ်	146-126-2345
always ယွှ	146-2456-126
always ယွှာ	146-2456-1
always ွှယွှား	146-2456-1-23
always ယွီ	13456-2456-246
always ယွိ	13456-2456-24
always ယွီး	13456-2456-246-23
always ယွေ	13456-2456-156
always ယွေ့	13456-2456-156-2
always ယွေး	13456-2456-156-23
always ယွှမ်	146-2456-124
always ယွှမ့်	146-2456-124-2
always ယွှမ်း	146-2456-124-23
always ယွှယ်	146-2456-2346
always ယွှယ့်	146-2456-2346-2
always ယှံ	146-124
always ယှံ့	146-124-2
always ယှဲ	146-2346-23
always ယှဲ့	146-2346-2
always ယာန်	13456-124
always ယျ	13456-126

# ZaGwel				
always ဇ	1356-126
always ဇာ	1356-1
always ဇာ့	1356-126
always ဇိ	1356-24
always ဇီ	1356-246
always ဇီ့	1356-24
always ဇီး	1356-246-23
always ဇူ	1356-136
always ဇူ့	1356-136-2
always ဇူး	1356-136-23
always ဇေ	1356-156
always ဇက်	1356-15
always ဇောက်	1356-356
always ဇင်	1356-35
always ဇင့်	1356-35-2
always ဇင်း	1356-35-23
always ဇောင်း	1356-2356-23
always ဇာစ်	1356-1346
always ဇေဋ်	1356-126-2345
always ဇာတ်	1356-126-2345
always ဇန်	1356-124
always ဇန့်	1356-124-2
always ဇန်း	1356-124-23
always ဇုန်	1356-14
always ဇုန့်	1356-14-2
always ဇုန်း	1356-14-23
always ဇုံ	1356-14
always ဇုံ့	1356-14-2
always ဇုံး	1356-14-23
always ဇမ်	1356-124
always ဇမ့်	1356-124-23
always ဇိမ်	1356-26
always ဇိမ့်	1356-26-2
always ဇိမ်း	1356-26-23
always ဇယ်	1356-2346
always ဇယ့်	1356-2346-2
always ဇွဲ	1356-2456-2346-23
always ဇွတ်	1356-136-2345
always ဇွန်	1356-136-1345
always ဇွန့်	1356-136-1345-2
always ဇွန်း	1356-136-1345-23
always ဇော	1356-12456-23
always ဇော့	1356-12456-2
always ဇော်	1356-12456
always ဇို	1356-135
always ဇိုး	1356-135-23
always ဇိုင်း	1356-235-23
always ဇဉ်	1356-35
always ဇား	1356-1-23
always ဇိုင်	1356-235
always ဇိုင့်	1356-235-2
always ဇဉ့်	1356-35-2
always ဇဉ်း	1356-35-23
always ဇု	1356-136-2
always ဇေ့	1356-156-2
always ဇေး	1356-156-23
always ဇိုး	1356-135-23
always ဇတ်	1356-126-2345
always ဇောင်	1356-2356
always ဇောင့်	1356-2356-2
always ဇစ်	1356-1346
always ဇွဲ	1356-2456-2346-23
always ဇွက်	1356-2456-15
always ဇွစ်	1356-2456-1346
always ဇွင်	1356-2456-35
always ဇွင့်	1356-2456-35-2
always ဇွင်း	1356-2456-35-23
always ဇဋ်	1356-126-2345
always ဇဏ်	1356-124
always ဇဏ့်	1356-124-2
always ဇဏ်း	1356-124-23
always ဇွဒ်	1356-2456-126-2345
always ဇွပ်	1356-2456-136-2345
always ဇွမ်	1356-2456-124
always ဇွမ့်	1356-2456-124-2
always ဇွမ်း	1356-2456-124-23
always ဇွယ်	1356-2456-2346
always ဇွယ့်	1356-2456-2346-2
always ဇမ်း	1356-124-23

# ZaMyinZwel				
always ဈ	1356-126
always ဈာ	1356-1
always ဈေး	1356-156-23
always ဈာန်	1356-124
always ဈာဉ်	1356-124
always ဈဉ်	1356-124
